Utah statutes.
70A-3-102.   Subject matter.

(1)  This chapter applies to negotiable instruments.  It does not apply to money, to payment orders governed by Title 70A, Chapter 4a, Uniform Commercial Code -- Funds Transfers, or to securities governed by Title 70A, Chapter 8, Uniform Commercial Code -- Investment Securities.

(2)  If there is conflict between this chapter and Title 70A, Chapter 4 or 9, Title 70A, Chapters 4 and 9, govern.

(3)  Regulations of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and operating circulars of the Federal Reserve Banks supersede any inconsistent provision of this chapter to the extent of the inconsistency.

